Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise."Tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) The secretary of state is authorized to enter into state-tribal compacts with tribes for the purposes of automatic voter registration of members of a tribe under section 3 of this act.(2) No later than six months after July 1, 2025, the secretary of state shall establish an application and approval process, procedures, and timelines for negotiation, approval or disapproval, and execution of state-tribal compacts for the purposes of automatic registration of the members of a tribe.(3) The process may be initiated by submission, to the secretary of state, of a resolution by the governing body of a tribe.(4) Within 90 days of receipt of a resolution and application under this section, the secretary of state must convene a government-to-government meeting for the purpose of considering the resolution and application and initiating negotiations.(5) The secretary of state shall adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) Upon final execution of a state-tribal compact under section 2 of this act, the secretary of state must receive and process voter registration information for all members of a tribe from the tribe by automated process if:(a) The applicant meets requirements for voter registration;(b) The record associated with each member of the tribe contains:(i) The data required to determine whether the applicant meets requirements for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.010;(ii) The name, traditional or nontraditional residence address, address where the person receives mail, if different from the residence address, and date of birth of the applicant;(iii) Documentation confirming the individual is a United States citizen;(iv) Other information as required by the secretary of state; and(v) A signature image.(2) For applicants served under this section, the application is marked as an automatic voter registrant.Sec. 4. RCW 29A.08.110 and 2023 c 466 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For persons registering under RCW 29A.08.120, 29A.08.123, 29A.08.170, 29A.08.330, 29A.08.340, 29A.08.362, and 29A.08.365, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of:(a) The original date of receipt;(b) When the person will be at least eighteen years old by the next election;(c) When the person will be at least seventeen years old by the next primary election or presidential primary election and eighteen years old by the general election, whichever is applicable; or(d) For voters utilizing automatic voter registration under RCW 29A.08.315 at the department of licensing or under section 3 of this act, the date that an election official receives the information to register the person to vote, unless:(i) The voter declines registration by the deadline in RCW 29A.08.359(4)(a); or(ii) An election official receives the information to register the person to vote after the deadline to register to vote under RCW 29A.08.140(1)(a), in which case the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the day after the election.(2) As soon as practicable, the auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. The secretary of state shall, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.611, establish procedures to enable new or updated voter registrations to be recorded on an expedited basis. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes.(3) The voter must be sent an acknowledgment notice using first-class nonforwardable mail:(a) For voters utilizing automatic voter registration services at the department of licensing, within five business days after the receipt of an application or residential address change, or, if the application or residential address change is received after the deadline to register to vote or update a voter registration under RCW 29A.08.140 (1)(a) or (2)(a)(i), within five business days after the election, the auditor shall send an automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package as required by RCW 29A.08.030.(b) For voters utilizing automatic voter registration services under section 3 of this act, within five business days after the receipt of an application, or, if the application is received after the deadline to register to vote or update a voter registration under RCW 29A.08.140(1)(a), within five business days after the election, the auditor shall send an automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package as required by RCW 29A.08.030.(c) For all other voters, within 60 days after the receipt of an application or residential address change, the auditor shall send an acknowledgment notice as required by RCW 29A.08.030.(4) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.(5) Once a future voter is no longer in pending status, as described in RCW 29A.08.615, his or her application to sign up to register to vote is no longer pending and is subject to this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) For persons registering under section 3 of this act, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 and other information as required by the secretary of state. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the date set forth in RCW 29A.08.110(1).(b) If the information shows no name change or change of residence or mailing address for an existing voter registration, the auditor may choose to send the voter an acknowledgment notice.(c) If the information is an application for new registration or updates any element of an existing voter registration, the auditor shall update the voter's record and, if the information updates the voter's name, residence address, or mailing address, record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list and send an automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package within five business days of the original application, or, if the information is received after the deadline to register to vote or update a voter registration under RCW 29A.08.140(1)(a), within five business days after the election. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes.(d) An auditor may use other means to communicate with potential and registered voters such as, but not limited to, email, phone, or text messaging. The alternate form of communication must not be in lieu of the mail requirements. The auditor shall act in compliance with all voter notification processes established in federal law.(2) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice must require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within 45 days, the applicant must be registered to vote. The applicant must not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.(3) If the prospective registration applicant responds to the automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice and declines to register to vote or the information provided by the department of licensing does not indicate citizenship, the information must not be included on the list of registered voters.(4)(a) For new registrants who decline registration in a reply that is received by the auditor within 15 days from the date of mailing of the automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package, the voter registration record shall be removed from the list of registered voters, and the person is deemed to have never registered to vote.(b) If the reply declining registration is received after the deadline, the auditor shall cancel the voter's registration.Sec. 6. RCW 29A.08.370 and 2023 c 466 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes, in the rare occasion, registered to vote under RCW 29A.08.355 ((or)), 29A.08.362, or section 3 of this act in the absence of a knowing violation by that person of RCW 29A.84.140, that person shall be deemed to have performed an authorized act of registration and such act may not be considered as evidence of a claim to citizenship.(2) Unless a person willfully and knowingly votes or attempts to vote knowing that he or she is not entitled to vote, a person who is ineligible to vote and becomes registered to vote under RCW 29A.08.355 or 29A.08.362, and subsequently votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the person's registration, is not guilty of violating RCW 29A.84.130, and shall be deemed to have performed an authorized act, and such act may not be considered as evidence of a claim to citizenship.(3) A person who is ineligible to vote, who successfully completes the voter registration process under RCW 29A.08.355 or 29A.08.362 or votes in an election, must have their voter registration, or record of vote, removed from the voter registration database and any other application records.(4) Should an ineligible individual become registered to vote, the office of the secretary of state and the relevant agency shall jointly determine the cause. If the cause is found to be intentional registration of ineligible persons by a person employed by the state or county government tasked with assisting the public with voter registration, that government employee is subject to the penalties of RCW 29A.84.110.--- END ---